Utah statutes.
7-3-32.   Meetings of board of directors -- Reports -- Records -- Loans to
officers, directors and principal shareholders.
(1)  In this section "principal shareholder" means any officer, director, or
person who directly or indirectly owns, controls, or has the power to vote
more than 10% of any class of voting securities of the bank.
(2)  The board of directors of every bank shall hold at least one regular
meeting every three months.  The board shall designate an officer or officers
of the bank to prepare and submit reports to the board at every regular
quarterly meeting in such detail as the board may direct.  Such reports shall
include pertinent information on the loans and investments, the transactions
with affiliates, and the lines of credit and acquisitions of real estate made
during the preceding quarter or since the last report.  It shall also include
information on delinquent loans, other possible losses, and such other
information as the regulations of the department may require.
(3)  At regular intervals at least twice each year, a report shall be made to
the board of:
(a)  the aggregate amount of all extensions of credit by the bank to its
officers, directors, and principal shareholders and their related interests;
and
(b)  all extensions of credit from a correspondent bank of the bank to an
executive officer or principal shareholder of the bank, since the last
preceding report.  The board of directors shall make the reports part of the
record of the meeting, and the record shall show its action.
